Hawaii statutes.
[§23-72] Review for 2018 and every
tenth year thereafter. (a) The exemptions and exclusions under the
general excise and use taxes listed in subsection (c) shall be reviewed in 2018
and every tenth year thereafter.

(b) The auditor shall submit the findings and
recommendations of the reviews to the legislature and governor no later than
twenty days prior to the convening of the immediately following regular
session.

(c) This section shall apply to the following:

(1) Section 237-3(b)--Gross receipts from the
following:

(A) Sales of securities;

(B) Sales of commodity futures;

(C) Sales of evidences of indebtedness;

(D) Fee simple sales of improved or
unimproved land;

(E) Dividends; and

(F) Sales or transfers of materials and
supplies, interest on loans, and provision of services among members of an
affiliated public service company group;

(2) Section 237-13(3)(B)--Gross income of contractors
from subcontractors;

(3) Section 237-13(3)(C)--Reimbursements to federal
cost-plus contractors;

(4) Section 237-13(6)(D)(i), (ii), (iii), and
(iv)--Gross receipts of home service providers acting as service carriers;

(5) Section 237-24.3(11)--Amounts received from
aircraft and aircraft engine rental or leasing;

(6) Section 237-24.9--Amounts received from aircraft
servicing and maintenance and aircraft service and maintenance facility
construction;

(7) Section 238-1, paragraph (6) of the definition of
"use"--The value of aircraft leases or rental and acquired or
imported aircrafts and aircraft engines; and

(8) Section 238-1, paragraph (8) of the definition of
"use"--The value of material, parts, or tools for aircraft service
and maintenance and aircraft service and maintenance facility construction. [L
2016, c 261, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next